Massachusetts, session 194th, H370.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
official edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 79 to 81, inclusive, the words “,
notwithstanding any limitation on the number of licenses the city or town is authorized to grant
in section 17,” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “pursuant to the municipal
plan as required by section 17.”
SECTION 2. Said section 12 of said chapter 138, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in lines 107 to 109, inclusive, the words “and irrespective of any
limitation of number of licenses contained in section seventeen”
of 2

SECTION 3. The first paragraph of section 14 of said chapter 138, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking out the first sentence and inserting in place thereof the following
sentence:- Special licenses for the sale of all alcoholic beverages or wine and malt beverages
only, or any of them, may be issued, as determined by the municipality, by the local licensing
authorities to the responsible manager of any indoor or outdoor activity or enterprise or to the
responsible manager of any nonprofit organization conducting any indoor or outdoor activity or
enterprise.
SECTION 4 . Section 17 of said chapter 138, as so appearing in the 2018 official edition,
is hereby amended by striking out the introductory paragraph and the first 4 paragraphs and
inserting in place thereof the following 3 paragraphs:-
Section 17. A city or town, except the city of Boston, shall determine the number of all
alcoholic beverage or wines and malt beverage licenses to be issued by its local licensing
authority under sections 12, 14 and 15F, including the number of seasonal licenses.
A city or town, except the city of Boston, that seeks to grant additional licenses on or
after January 1, 2022 under sections 12, 14 and 15F shall adopt a plan that is approved by the
mayor, city council or board of selectmen. The plan shall determine the process for granting
additional licenses; provided, however, that:
(i) at least 1 public hearing regarding the plan shall be conducted by the city council,
board of selectmen or governing body of the city or town; and (ii) the city or town shall notify
the alcoholic beverages control commission of the public hearing.
The governing body of each city or town, except the city of Boston, shall hold a public
hearing regarding a license application within 30 days of the date of the license application.
of 2